Massachusetts, session 194th, S194.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Subsection (a) of section 28A in Chapter 140D of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out paragraph (2) and inserting in place
thereof the following 2 paragraphs:-
(2) A seller shall not impose on a customer who uses a credit card for a transaction
occurring in the commonwealth a surcharge that is greater than the actual cost to the seller to
process the credit card payment.
(3) A seller that imposes a surcharge on a customer to process a credit card payment shall
disclose the amount of the surcharge, prior to the customer incurring any charge for goods or
services, by, in the case of a seller other than a restaurant, posting clear and conspicuous notice
on a sign at the point of sale or, in the case of a restaurant, on a sign in the customer service area
and on the menu; provided, however, that if the seller is processing a credit card payment for a
transaction that will occur through an internet website, a mobile application or an electronic
of 2

kiosk, the seller shall provide clear and conspicuous electronic notice on the checkout page of the
internet website, mobile application or electronic kiosk prior to processing the transaction; and
provided further, that if the seller is processing a credit card payment for a transaction that will
occur over the telephone, the seller shall provide verbal notice prior to processing the transaction.
of 2